Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.111

Forms—Accounting—Supervision by state.

The state auditor is empowered to make and install the forms and classifications required by this chapter to define what expenditures are chargeable to each budget class and to establish the accounting and cost systems necessary to secure accurate budget information.

[ 1995 c 301 s 42; 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 16.]